test/src/morphology/N-hwrak10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hõrak: # Noun (10) hõrak 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hõrak+N+Sg+Nom: hõrak
     hõrak+N+Sg+Gen: [hõraga, hõragu]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Par: hõrakat
     hõrak+N+Sg+Ill: [hõrakahe, hõrakuhe]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Gen: hõrakidõ
     hõrak+N+Pl+Par: hõrakit
     hõrak+N+Pl+Ill: hõrakihe
     hõrak+N+Pl+All: hõrakilõ
